apertium-cv-ru.cv.lexc
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!   M O R P H O L O G I C A L · T R A N S D U C E R · F O R · C H U V A S H !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

Multichar_Symbols

! Multichar symbols are enclosed in < > according to Apertium style, 
! archigraphemes are enclosed in { } according to Omorfi style

%<n%>        ! Noun
%<np%>       ! Proper noun
%<v%>        ! Verb
%<adv%>      ! Adverb
%<num%>      ! Numeral
%<adj%>      ! Adjective
%<ij%>       ! Interjection
%<prn%>      ! Pronoun
%<post%>     ! Postposition
%<cnjcoo%>   ! Coordinating conjunction
%<cnjsub%>   ! Subordinating conjunction
%<part%>     ! Particle

%<der‣caus%> ! Derivation (V→V): Causative
%<der‣lA%>   ! Derivation (N→V): 

%<sg%>       ! Singular
%<pl%>       ! Plural
%<attr%>     ! Attributive
%<pred%>     ! Predicative
%<abs%>      ! Absolutive
%<obj%>      ! Objective 
%<gen%>      ! Genitive 
%<ins%>      ! Instrumental 
%<loc%>      ! Locative
%<abl%>      ! Ablative
%<priv%>     ! Privative 
%<fin%>      ! Final(?)
%<dur%>      ! Durative
%<term%>     ! Terminative 
%<dist%>     ! Distive 
%<direc%>    ! Directive 
%<pres%>     ! Present
%<past%>     ! Past
%<p1%>       ! First person
%<p2%>       ! Second person
%<p3%>       ! Third person
%<m%>        ! Masculine 
%<f%>        ! Feminine
%<mf%>       ! Masculine / feminine
%<px1sg%>    ! Possessive first person, singular
%<px2sg%>    ! Possessive second person, singular
%<px3sg%>    ! Possessive third person, singular
%<px1pl%>    ! Possessive first person, plural
%<px2pl%>    ! Possessive second person, plural
%<px3pl%>    ! Possessive third person, plural
%<def%>      ! Definite
%<ind%>      ! Indefinite
%<dem%>      ! Demonstrative
%<pers%>     ! Personal
%<top%>      ! Toponym
%<ant%>      ! Anthroponym 
%<abbr%>     ! Abbreviation

%<pp%>       ! Past participle
%<pprs%>     ! Present participle
%<fp%>       ! Future participle
%<inf%>      ! Verbal noun / infinitive 
%<conv%>     ! Converb 
%<neg%>      ! Negative

%<clb%>      ! Clause level boundary
%<lquot%>    ! Left quote 
%<rquot%>    ! Right quote


%>           ! Morpheme boundary
%{A%}        ! Archivowel: а or е 
%{Ă%}        ! Archivowel: ӑ or ӗ
%{U%}        ! Archivowel: у or ӳ
%{р%}        ! Archiconsonant: р оr т 
%{н%}        ! Archiconsonant: н or м 
%{ь%}        ! ь or ''

LEXICON Root

NominalStems ;
Pronouns ;
VerbStems ;
ProperNouns ;
AdjStems ;
Numerals ;
Adverbs ; 
Postpos ; 
Particles ; 
Conjunctions ; 
Interjections ; 
Punct ; 

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                  C O N T I N U A T I O N      L E X I C A               !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!


LEXICON NOM-DECL-C

%<abs%>: # ;

! 1.  -ø          Optional with any stem
! 2.  >Ăn         After polysyllabic consonant stems and vocalic stems in -U employing
!                their stem alternant in -Ăv to replace U; some monosyllabic consonant
!                stems
! 3.  >n or >Ăn   After polysyllabic consonant stems except U and A
! 4.  C¹C¹Ă>N     After polysyllabic vowel stems in >-C¹Ă
! 5.  C¹C²Ă>n     After polysyllabic vowel stems in >-C¹C²Ă
! 6.  C¹>Ǎn       After borrowed polysyllabic stems in C¹C¹
! 7.  C¹C¹>Ăn     After some monosyllabic stems in C¹
! 8.  >n or >jěn  After native and foreign stems in -i
! 9.  -ă>n        After borrowed vowel stems in -a, -ja, -e, -u and some in -o
! 10. -o>n        After some borrowed vowel stems in -o
! 11. -s>ăn       After borrowed stems in -st'      

%<gen%>:%>%{A%}н # ;        ! 

%<obj%>%<ind%>: # ;          ! 
%<obj%>%<def%>:%>%{A%} # ;          ! 
%<loc%>:%>%{р%}%{A%} # ;        ! 
%<abl%>:%>%{р%}%{A%}н # ;        ! 
%<ins%>:%>п%{A%} # ;        ! 
%<fin%>:%>ш%{Ă%}н # ;      ! 
%<priv%>:%>с%{Ă%}р # ;      ! 
%<term%>:%>чен # ;          ! 
%<dist%>:%>серен # ;          ! 
%<direc%>:%>%{A%}лл%{A%} # ;          ! 

LEXICON NOM-DECL-C-BACK

%<abs%>: # ;

! 1.  -ø          Optional with any stem
! 2.  >Ăn         After polysyllabic consonant stems and vocalic stems in -U employing
!                their stem alternant in -Ăv to replace U; some monosyllabic consonant
!                stems
! 3.  >n or >Ăn   After polysyllabic consonant stems except U and A
! 4.  C¹C¹Ă>N     After polysyllabic vowel stems in >-C¹Ă
! 5.  C¹C²Ă>n     After polysyllabic vowel stems in >-C¹C²Ă
! 6.  C¹>Ǎn       After borrowed polysyllabic stems in C¹C¹
! 7.  C¹C¹>Ăn     After some monosyllabic stems in C¹
! 8.  >n or >jěn  After native and foreign stems in -i
! 9.  -ă>n        After borrowed vowel stems in -a, -ja, -e, -u and some in -o
! 10. -o>n        After some borrowed vowel stems in -o
! 11. -s>ăn       After borrowed stems in -st'      

%<gen%>:%>ан # ;        ! 

%<obj%>%<ind%>: # ;          ! 
%<obj%>%<def%>:%>а # ;          ! 
%<loc%>:%>%{р%}а # ;        ! 
%<abl%>:%>%{р%}ан # ;        ! 
%<ins%>:%>па # ;        ! 
%<fin%>:%>шӑн # ;      ! 
%<priv%>:%>сӑр # ;      ! 
%<term%>:%>чен # ;          ! 
%<dist%>:%>серен # ;          ! 
%<direc%>:%>алла # ;          ! 

LEXICON NOM-DECL-V

%<abs%>: # ;
%<gen%>:%>%{A%}н # ;        ! 

%<obj%>%<ind%>: # ;          ! 
%<obj%>%<def%>:%>%{A%} # ;          ! 
%<loc%>:%>%{р%}%{A%} # ;        ! 
%<abl%>:%>%{р%}%{A%}н # ;        ! 
%<ins%>:%>п%{A%} # ;        ! 
%<fin%>:%>ш%{Ă%}н # ;      ! 
%<priv%>:%>с%{Ă%}р # ;      ! 
%<term%>:%>чен # ;          ! 
%<dist%>:%>серен # ;          ! 
%<direc%>:%>лл%{A%} # ;          ! 

LEXICON NOM-PLUR-BACK-LOAN

%<pl%>:%>се%{н%} NOM-DECL-C-BACK ;
NOM-DECL-C-BACK ;

LEXICON NOM-PLUR-C

%<pl%>:%>се%{н%} NOM-DECL-C ;
NOM-DECL-C ;

LEXICON NOM-PLUR-V

%<pl%>:%>се%{н%} NOM-DECL-V ;
NOM-DECL-V ;

LEXICON NOM-POSS-O

%<px1sg%>:%>в%{Ă%}м NOM-PLUR-V ;
%<px2sg%>:%>в%{U%} NOM-PLUR-V ;
%<px3sg%>:%>вӗ NOM-PLUR-V ;
%<px1pl%>:%>в%{Ă%}м%{Ă%}р NOM-PLUR-V ;
%<px2pl%>:%>в%{Ă%}р NOM-PLUR-V ;
%<px3pl%>:%>вӗ NOM-PLUR-V ;
NOM-PLUR-V ;

LEXICON NOM-POSS-U

%<px1sg%>:%>в%{Ă%}м NOM-PLUR-V ;
%<px2sg%>:%>в%{U%} NOM-PLUR-V ;
%<px3sg%>:%>вӗ NOM-PLUR-V ;
%<px1pl%>:%>в%{Ă%}м%{Ă%}р NOM-PLUR-V ;
%<px2pl%>:%>в%{Ă%}р NOM-PLUR-V ;
%<px3pl%>:%>вӗ NOM-PLUR-V ;
NOM-PLUR-V ;

LEXICON NOM-POSS-V

%<px1sg%>:%>%{Ă%}м NOM-PLUR-V ;
%<px2sg%>:%>%{U%} NOM-PLUR-V ;
%<px3sg%>:%>ӗ NOM-PLUR-V ;
%<px1pl%>:%>%{Ă%}м%{Ă%}р NOM-PLUR-V ;
%<px2pl%>:%>%{Ă%}р NOM-PLUR-V ;
%<px3pl%>:%>ӗ NOM-PLUR-V ;
NOM-PLUR-V ;


LEXICON NOM-POSS-C

%<px1sg%>:%>%{Ă%}м NOM-PLUR-C ;
%<px2sg%>:%>%{U%} NOM-PLUR-C ;
%<px3sg%>:%>ӗ NOM-PLUR-C ;
%<px1pl%>:%>%{Ă%}м%{Ă%}р NOM-PLUR-C ;
%<px2pl%>:%>%{Ă%}р NOM-PLUR-C ;
%<px3pl%>:%>ӗ NOM-PLUR-C ;
NOM-PLUR-C ;

LEXICON NOM-POSS-BACK-LOAN

%<px1sg%>:%>ӑм NOM-PLUR-BACK-LOAN ;
%<px2sg%>:%>у NOM-PLUR-BACK-LOAN ;
%<px3sg%>:%>ӗ NOM-PLUR-BACK-LOAN ;
%<px1pl%>:%>ӑмӑр NOM-PLUR-BACK-LOAN ;
%<px2pl%>:%>ӑр NOM-PLUR-BACK-LOAN ;
%<px3pl%>:%>ӗ NOM-PLUR-BACK-LOAN ;
NOM-PLUR-BACK-LOAN ;

LEXICON NOM-C-REG

%<n%>: NOM-POSS-C ;
!%<der‣lA%>%<v%>:%>л%{A%} Vreg ; 

LEXICON NOM-O-REG

%<n%>: NOM-POSS-O ;

LEXICON NOM-U-REG

%<n%>: NOM-POSS-U ;

LEXICON NOM-V-REG

%<n%>: NOM-POSS-V ;

LEXICON NOM-K-LOAN

%<n%>: NOM-POSS-BACK-LOAN ;




LEXICON NP-C

%<np%>: NOM-DECL-C ;

LEXICON NP-TOP-C

%<np%>%<top%>: NOM-DECL-C ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-MSC-C

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>: NOM-DECL-C ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-FEM-V

%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>: NOM-DECL-V ;

LEXICON NP-COG-MF-C 

%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>: NOM-DECL-C ;


LEXICON NP-V

%<np%>: NOM-DECL-V ;

LEXICON NP-TOP-V

%<np%>%<top%>: NOM-DECL-V ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-MSC-V

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>: NOM-DECL-V ;

LEXICON NUMshort

%<num%>%<attr%>: # ;

LEXICON NUMlong

%<num%>%<pred%>: # ;
%<num%>%<ord%>:м%{Ă%}ш # ;

LEXICON NUM-ABBR

%<num%>%<abbr%>: # ;


LEXICON ADV 

%<adv%>: # ;

LEXICON POST 

%<post%>: # ;

LEXICON CLB

%<clb%>: # ;

LEXICON ADJ

%<adj%>: # ;

LEXICON CC 

%<cnjcoo%>: # ; 

LEXICON CS

%<cnjsub%>: # ; 

LEXICON PART

%<part%>: # ; 

LEXICON INTERJ

%<ij%>: # ; 

LEXICON NominalStems
вырсарни% кун NOM-C-REG ; ! "воскресенье"
вӗренекен NOM-C-REG ; ! "учащийся" 
департамент NOM-C-REG ; 
кун NOM-C-REG ;
ӗҫ NOM-C-REG ; ! "работа, труд"
кӑнтӑр NOM-C-REG ; 
кӗҫнерни% кун NOM-C-REG ; ! "четверг"
лаптӑк NOM-C-REG ; ! "площадь, пространство; участок"
мир NOM-C-REG ; 
мулкач NOM-C-REG ; ! "" 
паллӑ NOM-C-REG ; ! "знак, метка; отметка, оценка" 
сын NOM-C-REG ; 
ударник NOM-C-REG ; 
фабрик NOM-C-REG ; 
хавас NOM-C-REG ; 
хваттер NOM-C-REG ;
чечек NOM-C-REG ; 
шыв NOM-C-REG ; ! "вода" 
ывӑл NOM-C-REG ; ! "сын" 
юн% кун NOM-C-REG ; ! "среда"
юханшыв NOM-C-REG ; ! "река" 
юханшыв:юхан% шыв NOM-C-REG ; ! "река"  @LR@
ял NOM-C-REG ; ! "село, деревня" 
ҫул NOM-C-REG ; ! "" 
ҫурт NOM-C-REG ;
ҫын NOM-C-REG ; ! "человек" 
тӗп NOM-C-REG ; ! "дно, днище; подошва"
ҫурҫӗр NOM-C-REG ; 
ҫухрӑм NOM-C-REG ; ! "верста, километр" 
ҫӗр NOM-C-REG ; ! "ночь, земля" 
старик NOM-C-REG ; ! "" 
праҫник NOM-C-REG ; ! "" 
премӗк NOM-C-REG ; ! ""
шкул NOM-C-REG ; ! "школа"
юлташ NOM-C-REG ; ! "друг"
ир NOM-C-REG ; ! "утро"
ҫӗлӗк NOM-C-REG ; ! "шапка"
ача NOM-V-REG ;
хула NOM-V-REG ; ! "город"
атте NOM-V-REG ; ! "отец"
курма NOM-V-REG ;
кӗнеке NOM-V-REG ; ! "книга"
кӳлӗ NOM-V-REG ; ! "озеро" 
республика NOM-V-REG ;
ту NOM-V-REG ;
урам NOM-V-REG ; ! "улица"
тӑва NOM-V-REG ;
тӳпе NOM-V-REG ;
сӑмса NOM-V-REG ; ! "нос" 
уй NOM-V-REG ;
чикӗ NOM-V-REG ;
ҫӗрӗ NOM-V-REG ; ! "кольцо, перстень"
ҫыр:ҫыру NOM-U-REG ; ! "письмо"
кино NOM-O-REG ; ! "кино"
депо NOM-O-REG ;
бюро NOM-O-REG ;
техник NOM-K-LOAN ;  ! "техник"
колхозник NOM-K-LOAN ;  ! "колхозник"
чертӗжник NOM-K-LOAN ;  ! ""
механик NOM-K-LOAN ;  ! ""
семинар NOM-V-REG ; ! "семинар"
завод NOM-C-REG ; 
трактор NOM-C-REG ; 
католик NOM-C-REG ;  ! "" {католиксемпе}
редактор NOM-C-REG ; 
колхозник NOM-C-REG ; 
поезд NOM-C-REG ; 
фонетика NOM-V-REG ;
библиотека NOM-V-REG ; ! "библиотека"
